Mississippi, session 2026, HB1388.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 63-1-41, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 63-1-41.  Every licensee shall have the required license in his immediate possession at all times when operating a motor vehicle and shall display the same by handing the license to the law enforcement officer, upon demand of a justice court judge, a peace officer or license examiner or other authorized employee of the commissioner.  However, no person charged with violating this section shall be convicted if he produces in court a license theretofore issued to him and valid at the time of his arrest. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.